District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.09

Stock operations and advisory board contracts.

No person, as an inducement to purchase insurance, shall issue or deliver, or permit its agents, officers, or employees to issue or deliver:

(1)

Agency company stock or other capital stock, benefit certificates, or shares in a common law corporation;

(2)

Securities; or

(3)

A special or advisory board contract or other contracts of any kind promising returns and profits.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 109, 48 DCR 1225